Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202529-1918
Discovery of additional evidence or material; disclosure to other party or court; conditions.

A party who discovers additional evidence or material before or during trial must promptly disclose its existence to the other party or the court if:

(1) The evidence or material is subject to discovery or inspection under sections 29-1912 to 29-1921; and

(2) The other party previously requested, or the court ordered, the production of such evidence or material.

Laws 1969, c. 235, § 7, p. 870;

Laws 2019, LB496, § 8;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 32.